District of Columbia statutes.
7-1306.02

Severability.

Should any provision of this chapter be declared to be unconstitutional or beyond the statutory authority of the Council, the remaining provisions of this chapter shall remain in effect.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 602, 25 DCR 5094
1981 Ed., § 6-1982.
1973 Ed., § 6-1696.